Illinois, session 104th, HB1316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-27.1A as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-27.1A)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-609)8    Sec. 10-27.1A. Firearms in schools. 9    (a) All school officials, including teachers, school 10counselors, and support staff, shall immediately notify the 11office of the principal in the event that they:12        (1) observe any person in possession of a firearm on 13    school grounds; 14        (2) become aware of any person in possession of a 15    firearm on school grounds; or 16        (3) become aware of any threat of gun violence on 17    school grounds; 18provided that taking such immediate action to notify the 19office of the principal would not immediately endanger the 20health, safety, or welfare of students who are under the 21direct supervision of the school official or the school 22official. If the health, safety, or welfare of students under 23the direct supervision of the school official or of the school   HB1316 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1official is immediately endangered, the school official shall 2notify the office of the principal as soon as the students 3under his or her supervision and he or she are no longer under 4immediate danger. A report is not required by this Section 5when the school official knows that the person in possession 6of the firearm is a law enforcement official engaged in the 7conduct of his or her official duties. Any school official 8acting in good faith who makes such a report under this Section 9shall have immunity from any civil or criminal liability that 10might otherwise be incurred as a result of making the report. 11The identity of the school official making such report shall 12not be disclosed except as expressly and specifically 13authorized by law. Knowingly and willfully failing to comply 14with this Section is a petty offense. A second or subsequent 15offense is a Class C misdemeanor.16    (b) Upon receiving a report from any school official 17pursuant to this Section, or from any other person, the 18principal or his or her designee shall immediately notify a 19local law enforcement agency. If the person found to be in 20possession of a firearm on school grounds is a student, the 21principal or his or her designee shall also immediately notify 22that student's parent or guardian. If the report pertains to a 23threat of firearm violence made by a student, the principal or 24the principal's designee shall attempt to notify that 25student's parent or guardian as soon as possible. The 26principal or principal's designee shall further attempt to   HB1316 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1contact the student's parent or guardian so that the parent or 2guardian may ensure that the student does not have access to a 3firearm. Any principal or his or her designee acting in good 4faith who makes such reports under this Section shall have 5immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might 6otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making the 7reports. Knowingly and willfully failing to comply with this 8Section is a petty offense. A second or subsequent offense is a 9Class C misdemeanor. If the person found to be in possession of 10the firearm on school grounds is a minor, the law enforcement 11agency shall detain that minor until such time as the agency 12makes a determination pursuant to clause (a) of subsection (1) 13of Section 5-401 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, as to 14whether the agency reasonably believes that the minor is 15delinquent. If the law enforcement agency determines that 16probable cause exists to believe that the minor committed a 17violation of item (4) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 18Criminal Code of 2012 while on school grounds, the agency 19shall detain the minor for processing pursuant to Section 205-407 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.21    (c) Upon receipt of any written, electronic, or verbal 22report from any school personnel regarding a verified incident 23involving a firearm in a school or on school owned or leased 24property, including any conveyance owned, leased, or used by 25the school for the transport of students or school personnel, 26the superintendent or his or her designee shall report all   HB1316 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1such firearm-related incidents occurring in a school or on 2school property to the local law enforcement authorities 3immediately.4    (c-5) Schools shall report any written, electronic, or 5verbal report of a verified incident involving a firearm made 6under subsection (c) to the State Board of Education through 7existing school incident reporting systems as they occur 8during the year by no later than August 1 of each year. The 9State Board of Education shall report data by school district, 10as collected from school districts, and make it available to 11the public via its website. The local law enforcement 12authority shall, by March 1 of each year, report the required 13data from the previous year to the Illinois State Police's 14Illinois Uniform Crime Reporting Program, which shall be 15included in its annual Crime in Illinois report. 16    (d) As used in this Section, the term "firearm" shall have 17the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 18Identification Card Act.19    As used in this Section, the term "school" means any 20public or private elementary or secondary school.21    As used in this Section, the term "school grounds" 22includes the real property comprising any school, any 23conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a school to 24transport students to or from school or a school-related 25activity, or any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 26property comprising any school.  HB1316 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-609, eff. 37-1-24.) 4    (Text of Section from P.A. 103-780)5    Sec. 10-27.1A. Firearms in schools. 6    (a) All school officials, including teachers, school 7counselors, and support staff, shall immediately notify the 8office of the principal in the event that they:9        (1) observe any person in possession of a firearm on 10    school grounds; 11        (2) become aware of any person in possession of a 12    firearm on school grounds; or 13        (3) become aware of any threat of gun violence on 14    school grounds; 15provided that taking such immediate action to notify the 16office of the principal would not immediately endanger the 17health, safety, or welfare of students who are under the 18direct supervision of the school official or the school 19official. If the health, safety, or welfare of students under 20the direct supervision of the school official or of the school 21official is immediately endangered, the school official shall 22notify the office of the principal as soon as the students 23under his or her supervision and he or she are no longer under 24immediate danger. A report is not required by this Section 25when the school official knows that the person in possession   HB1316 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1of the firearm is a law enforcement official engaged in the 2conduct of his or her official duties. Any school official 3acting in good faith who makes such a report under this Section 4shall have immunity from any civil or criminal liability that 5might otherwise be incurred as a result of making the report. 6The identity of the school official making such report shall 7not be disclosed except as expressly and specifically 8authorized by law. Knowingly and willfully failing to comply 9with this Section is a petty offense. A second or subsequent 10offense is a Class C misdemeanor.11    (b) Upon receiving a report from any school official 12pursuant to this Section, or from any other person, the 13principal or his or her designee shall immediately notify a 14local law enforcement agency. If the person found to be in 15possession of a firearm on school grounds is a student, the 16principal or his or her designee shall also immediately notify 17that student's parent or guardian. If the report pertains to a 18threat of firearm violence made by a student, the principal or 19the principal's designee shall attempt to notify that 20student's parent or guardian as soon as possible. The 21principal or principal's designee shall further attempt to 22contact the student's parent or guardian so that the parent or 23guardian may ensure that the student does not have access to a 24firearm. Any principal or his or her designee acting in good 25faith who makes such reports under this Section shall have 26immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might   HB1316 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making the 2reports. Knowingly and willfully failing to comply with this 3Section is a petty offense. A second or subsequent offense is a 4Class C misdemeanor. If the person found to be in possession of 5the firearm on school grounds is a minor, the law enforcement 6agency shall detain that minor until such time as the agency 7makes a determination pursuant to clause (a) of subsection (1) 8of Section 5-401 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, as to 9whether the agency reasonably believes that the minor is 10delinquent. If the law enforcement agency determines that 11probable cause exists to believe that the minor committed a 12violation of item (4) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 13Criminal Code of 2012 while on school grounds, the agency 14shall detain the minor for processing pursuant to Section 155-407 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.16    (c) Upon receipt of any written, electronic, or verbal 17report from any school personnel regarding a verified incident 18involving a firearm in a school or on school owned or leased 19property, including any conveyance owned, leased, or used by 20the school for the transport of students or school personnel, 21the superintendent or his or her designee shall report all 22such firearm-related incidents occurring in a school or on 23school property to the local law enforcement authorities 24immediately.25    (c-5) Schools shall report any written, electronic, or 26verbal report of a verified incident involving a firearm made   HB1316 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1under subsection (c) to the State Board of Education through 2existing school incident reporting systems as they occur 3during the year by no later than July 31 for the previous 4school year. The State Board of Education shall report data by 5school district, as collected from school districts, and make 6it available to the public via its website. The local law 7enforcement authority shall, by March 1 of each year, report 8the required data from the previous year to the Illinois State 9Police's Illinois Uniform Crime Reporting Program, which shall 10be included in its annual Crime in Illinois report. 11    (d) As used in this Section, the term "firearm" shall have 12the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 13Identification Card Act.14    As used in this Section, the term "school" means any 15public or private elementary or secondary school.16    As used in this Section, the term "school grounds" 17includes the real property comprising any school, any 18conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a school to 19transport students to or from school or a school-related 20activity, or any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 21property comprising any school.22(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-780, eff. 248-2-24.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   HB1316 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 05886 LNS 15917 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.